dictsource/crh_rules
// ***************************************************************************/ 
// *   Crimean Tatar Language crh crh_rules                                  *
// *   Original Author Andy Vladescu 05-05-2024                              *
// *   Contact info: andyvladescu770@gmail.com                               *
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/

// This file is UTF-8 encoded

// Vowels
.L01 a ı o u     // back vowels
.L02 â e i ö ü   // front vowels

// Consonants
.L03 b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n ñ p q r s ş t v y z

.replace
    // Replace Cyrillic script to Latin script
	    а       a
		б       b
		в       v
		г       g
		гъ      ğ
		д       d
		е       e
		ё       ö
		ж       j
		з       z
		и       i
		й       y
		к       k
		къ      q
		л       l
		м       m
		н       n
		нъ      ñ
		о       o
		п       p
		р       r
		с       s
		т       t
		у       u
		ф       f
		х       h
		ц       ts
		ч       ç
		дж      c
		ш       ş
		щ       şç
		ъ       -
		ы       ı
		ь       -
		э       e
		ю       ü
		я       â
		
.group a
        a       A
		a (_   'A
		a (L03_ 'A
		a (L03L03_ 'A
		aa      A:
		aa (_  'A:
		aa (L03_ 'A:
		aa (L03L03_ 'A:
		ai      aIj
		ai (_  'aIj
		ai (L03_ 'aIj
		ai (L03L03_ 'aIj
		av (_   'Aw
		ay      aIj
		ay (_  'aIj
		ay (L03_ 'aIj
		ay (L03L03_ 'aIj
		
.group â
        â       ;A:
		â  (CC  ;'A:
		â  (_   ;'A:
		â  (L03_ ;'A:
		â  (L03L03_ ;'A:
		
.group b
        b        b
		bb       b:
		
.group c
        c        dZ
		cc       dZ:
		
   L01) c        dZ
   L02) c        dZ;
   L01) c (_     dZ;
   L02) c (_     dZ;
   L01) cc       dZ:
   L02) cc       dZ;:
   L01) cc (_    dZ:
   L02) cc (_    dZ;:
  

.group ç
        ç        tS
		çç       tS:
		
   L01) ç        tS
   L02) ç        tS;
   L01) ç (_     tS;
   L02) ç (_     tS;
   L01) çç       tS:
   L02) çç       tS;:
   L01) çç (_    tS;:
   L02) çç (_    tS;:
   
.group d
        d          d
		dd         d:
		
		d  (â      d;
		d  (e      d;
		d  (i      d;
		d  (ö      d;
		d  (ü      d;

		da (_    d'A
		dâ (_    d;'A:
		de (_    d;;'e
		di (_    d'I
		do (_    d'o
		du (_    d'u
		dö (_    d;'o
		dü (_    d;'u
   L01) d        d
   L02) d        d;
   L01) d  (_    d
   L02) d  (_    d
   L01) dd       d:
   L02) dd       d;:
   L01) dd (_    d:
   L02) dd (_    d;:
        dır (_   =d@r
		dir (_   =dIr
	
		
.group e
        e         ;e
		e  (_    ;'e
		e  (L03_ ;'e
		e  (L03L03_ ;'e
		ee        ;e:
		ee (_    ;'e:
		ee (L03_ ;'e:
		ee (L03L03_ ;'e:
		
.group f
        f         f
		
.group g
        g         g
		gg        g:

		g (â      J
		g (e      J
		g (i      J
		g (ö      g
		g (ü      g
		
   L01) g         g
   L02) g         J
   L01) g (_      g
   L02) g (_      J
   L01) gg        g
   L02) gg        J:
   L01) gg (_     g
   L02) gg (_     J:
   

.group ğ
        ğ         Q
		ğğ        Q:
	  
		
.group h
        h         x
   L01) h         x
   L02) h         C
   L01) h (_      x
   L02) h (_      x
		hi  (_    C'I
		
.group ı
        ı         @
		ı  (_    '@
		ı  (L03_ '@
		ı  (L03L03_ '@
		
.group i
        i         i
		i  (_    'I
		i  (L03_ 'I
		i  (L03L03_ 'I
		ia (_     j'a
		ia (L03_  j'a
		ia (L03L03_ j'a
		io (_     j'o
		io (L03_  j'o
		io (L03L03_ j'o
		iy (_    'ij
		iy (L03_ 'ij
		iy (L03L03_ 'ij
		iya (_   'ija
		iye (_   'ije
		
.group j
        j         Z
		
.group k
        k         k
		kk        k:

		k (â      c
		k (e      c
		k (i      c
		k (ö      k
		k (ü      k

   L01) k         k
   L02) k         c
   L01) k (_      k
   L02) k (_      c
        ka (_     k'A
		kâ (_     c'A:
		ke (_     c;'e
		ki (_     k'I
		ko (_     k'o
		ku (_     k'u
   L01) kk        k:
   L02) kk        c:
   L01) kk (_     k:
   L02) kk (_     c:
   
.group l
        l         l
	    l (L01    L
   L01) l (K      L
   
		la  (_    L'A
		le  (_    l;'e
		lı  (_    l'@
		li  (_    l'I
		lar (_    L'Ar
		ler (_    l'er
		lıq (_    L'@q
		lır (_    L'@r
		lik (_    l'Ik
		
.group m
        m         m
		
.group n
        n         n
		n (g      N
		n (h      N
		n (k      N
		
		na  (_    n'A
		ne  (_    n;'e
		nı  (_    n'@
		ni  (_    n'I
		nce (_    =ndZ;;e
		
.group ñ
        ñ         N
		
.group o
        o         o
		o  (_    'o
		o  (L03_ 'o
		o  (L03L03_ 'o
		oy        oIj
		oy (_    'oIj
		oy (L03_ 'oIj
		oy (L03L03_ 'oIj
		
.group ö
        ö         o
		ö  (CC   'W
		ö  (_    'W
		ö  (L03_ 'W
		ö  (L03L03_ 'W

.group p
        p         p
		pp        p:
		
.group q
        q         q
		qq        q:
		
.group r
        r         r
     A) r (A      *
     ğ) r (A      *
     C) r (_      @-r
		
.group s
        s         s
		sın (_   =s@n
		sıñ (_   =s@N
		sız (_   =s@z
		
.group ş
        ş         S
		
.group t
        t         t
		tt        t:
		
		t (â      t;
		t (e      t;
		t (i      t;
		t (ö      t;
		t (ü      t;
   
   L01) t         t
   L02) t         t;
   L01) t (_      t
   L02) t (_      t
		tt        t:
		ta (_     t'A
		tâ (_     t;'A:
		te (_     t;;'e
		ti (_     t'I
		to (_     t'o
		tu (_     t'u
		tö (_     t;'o
		tü (_     t;'u
   L01) tt        t:
   L02) tt        t;:
   L01) tt (_     t:
   L02) tt (_     t:
   
.group ts
         ts       ts
		
.group u
        u         u
		u  (_    'u
		u  (L03_ 'u
		u  (L03L03_ 'u
		um (_    =um
		uy        uIj
		uy (_    'uIj
		uy (L03_ 'uIj
		uy (L03L03_ 'uIj
		
.group ü
        ü         u
		ü  (_    'y
		ü  (L03_ 'y
		ü  (L03L03_ 'y
		üm (_     =ym
		
.group v
        v         v
   L01) v         w
   L02) v         v
   L01) v (_      w
   L02) v (_      v
        ve (_     v;'e
		vi (_     v'I
		vo (_     v'o
		vu (_     v'u
        viy  (_   v'ij
		
.group w
        w         w
		
.group x
        x         ks
		
.group y
        y         j
		y  (a     ja
		ya (_     j'a

.group z
        z         z
		
